Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.042

Shares—Certificate not required.

(1) Shares of a savings bank may, but need not be, represented by certificates. Unless this title expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are identical whether or not their shares are represented by certificates. At a minimum, each share certificate must state the information required to be stated and must be signed as provided in RCW 23B.06.250 and/or 23B.06.270 for corporations.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a savings bank may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the savings bank.

(3) Within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the savings bank shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required to be stated on certificates under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 1994 c 256 s 114.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.